Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1221
County attorney; deputy county attorney; removal from office; vacancy; how filled.

If a county attorney is removed from office as a result of the action authorized under section 23-1220, such office shall be declared vacant and the county board shall fill the vacancy by appointment with a qualified candidate. If a deputy county attorney is removed from office as a result of the action authorized under section 23-1220, the vacancy may be filled pursuant to section 23-1204.

Laws 1980, LB 790, § 10.